spellchecker/hunspell/bak/bash (1).aff
FLAG num
SFX 338 ү п/316 өү +GerPerf/п
SFX 338 ү бөрәк өү +GerPerf/п+Comp
SFX 338 ү мәйенсә/312 өү +GerPerf/майынса
SFX 338 ү мәйенсәрәк өү +GerPerf/майынса+Comp
SFX 338 ү мәйсә/312 өү +GerPerf/майса
SFX 338 ү мәйсәрәк өү +GerPerf/майса+Comp
SFX 338 ү гәнсә/312 өү +GerPerf/ғанса
SFX 338 ү гәнсәрәк өү +GerPerf/ғанса+Comp
SFX 338 ү ргә/318 өү +Inf
SFX 338 ү мәҫкә/318 өү +Inf+Neg
SFX 338 ү һәнә өү +Imp+Clt/һана
SFX 338 ү сәле өү +Imp+Clt/сәле
SFX 338 ү мәк өү +ActArch
SFX 338 ү гөс/16 өү +Der/ғыс
SFX 338 ү ш/110 өү +Der/ыш
SFX 338 ү мәҫлек/14 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ
SFX 338 ү гөстәр/116 өү +Der/ғыс+Pl
SFX 338 ү гөстөң/120 өү +Der/ғыс+Gen
SFX 338 ү гөскә/122 өү +Der/ғыс+Dat
SFX 338 ү гөскәрәк өү +Der/ғыс+Dat+Comp
SFX 338 ү гөстө/124 өү +Der/ғыс+Acc
SFX 338 ү гөстән/118,340 өү +Der/ғыс+Abl
SFX 338 ү гөстә/122,340 өү +Der/ғыс+Loc
SFX 338 ү гөстәрәк өү +Der/ғыс+Loc+Comp
SFX 338 ү гөсмөн/129 өү +Der/ғыс+Pred1Sg
SFX 338 ү гөсһөң/129 өү +Der/ғыс+Pred2Sg
SFX 338 ү гөсбөҙ/133 өү +Der/ғыс+Pred1Pl
SFX 338 ү гөсһөгөҙ/133 өү +Der/ғыс+Pred2Pl
SFX 338 ү гөс/198 өү +Der/ғыс
SFX 338 ү гөсмө өү +Der/ғыс+Q
SFX 338 ү гөсмөлөр өү +Der/ғыс+Q+Indf
SFX 338 ү гөстөр өү +Der/ғыс+Indf
SFX 338 ү гөссө өү +Der/ғыс+Clt/сы
SFX 338 ү гөстөкө/138,342 өү +Der/ғыс+Poss
SFX 338 ү гөскәй/140 өү +Der/ғыс+Dim
SFX 338 ү гөстәй/142 өү +Der/ғыс+Der/дай
SFX 338 ү гөссә/144 өү +Der/ғыс+Der/са
SFX 338 ү гөстәге/146 өү +Der/ғыс+Der/дағы
SFX 338 ү гөстәгеләр/116 өү +Der/ғыс+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 338 ү гөслө/150 өү +Der/ғыс+Der/лы
SFX 338 ү гөсһөҙ/154 өү +Der/ғыс+Abe
SFX 338 ү гөскәсә/156 өү +Der/ғыс+Der/ҡаса
SFX 338 ү штәр/116 өү +Der/ыш+Pl
SFX 338 ү штөң/120 өү +Der/ыш+Gen
SFX 338 ү шкә/122 өү +Der/ыш+Dat
SFX 338 ү шкәрәк өү +Der/ыш+Dat+Comp
SFX 338 ү штө/124 өү +Der/ыш+Acc
SFX 338 ү штән/118,340 өү +Der/ыш+Abl
SFX 338 ү штә/122,340 өү +Der/ыш+Loc
SFX 338 ү штәрәк өү +Der/ыш+Loc+Comp
SFX 338 ү шмөн/129 өү +Der/ыш+Pred1Sg
SFX 338 ү шһөң/129 өү +Der/ыш+Pred2Sg
SFX 338 ү шбөҙ/133 өү +Der/ыш+Pred1Pl
SFX 338 ү шһөгөҙ/133 өү +Der/ыш+Pred2Pl
SFX 338 ү ш/198 өү +Der/ыш
SFX 338 ү шмө өү +Der/ыш+Q
SFX 338 ү шмөлөр өү +Der/ыш+Q+Indf
SFX 338 ү штөр өү +Der/ыш+Indf
SFX 338 ү шсө өү +Der/ыш+Clt/сы
SFX 338 ү штөкө/138,342 өү +Der/ыш+Poss
SFX 338 ү шкәй/140 өү +Der/ыш+Dim
SFX 338 ү штәй/142 өү +Der/ыш+Der/дай
SFX 338 ү шсә/144 өү +Der/ыш+Der/са
SFX 338 ү штәге/146 өү +Der/ыш+Der/дағы
SFX 338 ү штәгеләр/116 өү +Der/ыш+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 338 ү шлө/150 өү +Der/ыш+Der/лы
SFX 338 ү шһөҙ/154 өү +Der/ыш+Abe
SFX 338 ү шкәсә/156 өү +Der/ыш+Der/ҡаса
SFX 338 ү мәҫлеклек/108 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/лыҡ
SFX 338 ү мәҫлеклән/216 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/ла+Pass
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектәр/116 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Pl
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектең/118 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Gen
SFX 338 ү мәҫлеккә/122 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Dat
SFX 338 ү мәҫлеккәрәк өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекте/122 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Acc
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектән/118,340 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Abl
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектә/122,340 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Loc
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектәрәк өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекмен/127 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Pred1Sg
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекһең/127 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Pred2Sg
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекбеҙ/131 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Pred1Pl
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекһегеҙ/131 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Pred2Pl
SFX 338 ү мәҫлек/207 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекме өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Q
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекмелер өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Q+Indf
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектер өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Indf
SFX 338 ү мәҫлексе өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Clt/сы
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектеке/136,340 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Poss
SFX 338 ү мәҫлеккәй/140 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Dim
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектәй/142 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/дай
SFX 338 ү мәҫлексә/144 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/са
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектәге/146 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/дағы
SFX 338 ү мәҫлектәгеләр/116 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекле/148 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/лы
SFX 338 ү мәҫлекһеҙ/152 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Abe
SFX 338 ү мәҫлеккәсә/156 өү +Neg+Prc+Der/лыҡ+Der/ҡаса

SFX 339 Y 20 # nominal predicate continuation, harmony ы
SFX 339 0 мын . +Pred1Sg
SFX 339 0 мынмы . +Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 339 0 мындыр . +Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 339 0 мынмылыр . +Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 339 0 мынсы . +Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 339 0 һың . +Pred2Sg
SFX 339 0 һыңмы . +Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 339 0 һыңдыр . +Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 339 0 һыңмылыр . +Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 339 0 һыңсы . +Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 339 0 быҙ . +Pred1Pl
SFX 339 0 быҙмы . +Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 339 0 быҙҙыр . +Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 339 0 быҙмылыр . +Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 339 0 быҙсы . +Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 339 0 һығыҙ . +Pred2Pl
SFX 339 0 һығыҙмы . +Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 339 0 һығыҙҙыр . +Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 339 0 һығыҙмылыр . +Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 339 0 һығыҙсы . +Pred2Pl+Clt/сы

SFX 340 Y 20 # nominal predicate continuation, harmony е
SFX 340 0 мен . +Pred1Sg
SFX 340 0 менме . +Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 340 0 мендер . +Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 340 0 менмелер . +Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 340 0 менсе . +Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 340 0 һең . +Pred2Sg
SFX 340 0 һеңме . +Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 340 0 һеңдер . +Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 340 0 һеңмелер . +Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 340 0 һеңсе . +Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 340 0 беҙ . +Pred1Pl
SFX 340 0 беҙме . +Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 340 0 беҙҙер . +Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 340 0 беҙмелер . +Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 340 0 беҙсе . +Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 340 0 һегеҙ . +Pred2Pl
SFX 340 0 һегеҙме . +Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 340 0 һегеҙҙер . +Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 340 0 һегеҙмелер . +Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 340 0 һегеҙсе . +Pred2Pl+Clt/сы

SFX 341 Y 20 # nominal predicate continuation, harmony о
SFX 341 0 мон . +Pred1Sg
SFX 341 0 монмо . +Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 341 0 мондор . +Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 341 0 монмолор . +Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 341 0 монсо . +Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 341 0 һоң . +Pred2Sg
SFX 341 0 һоңмо . +Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 341 0 һоңдор . +Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 341 0 һоңмолор . +Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 341 0 һоңсо . +Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 341 0 боҙ . +Pred1Pl
SFX 341 0 боҙмо . +Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 341 0 боҙҙор . +Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 341 0 боҙмолор . +Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 341 0 боҙсо . +Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 341 0 һоғоҙ . +Pred2Pl
SFX 341 0 һоғоҙмо . +Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 341 0 һоғоҙҙор . +Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 341 0 һоғоҙмолор . +Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 341 0 һоғоҙсо . +Pred2Pl+Clt/сы

SFX 342 Y 20 # nominal predicate continuation, harmony ө
SFX 342 0 мөн . +Pred1Sg
SFX 342 0 мөнмө . +Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 342 0 мөндөр . +Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 342 0 мөнмөлөр . +Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 342 0 мөнсө . +Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 342 0 һөң . +Pred2Sg
SFX 342 0 һөңмө . +Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 342 0 һөңдөр . +Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 342 0 һөңмөлөр . +Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 342 0 һөңсө . +Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 342 0 бөҙ . +Pred1Pl
SFX 342 0 бөҙмө . +Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 342 0 бөҙҙөр . +Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 342 0 бөҙмөлөр . +Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 342 0 бөҙсө . +Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 342 0 һөгөҙ . +Pred2Pl
SFX 342 0 һөгөҙмө . +Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 342 0 һөгөҙҙөр . +Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 342 0 һөгөҙмөлөр . +Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 342 0 һөгөҙсө . +Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
